California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) Every applicant for a certificate or transfer of a certificate shall file in the office of the commission an application therefor in the form required by the commission. The commission may, with or without a hearing, issue the certificate as requested, or refuse to issue it, or issue it for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate terms and conditions that, in its judgment, are required in the public interest.

(b) (1) Before a certificate is issued or transferred, the commission shall require the applicant to establish reasonable fitness and financial responsibility to initiate and conduct, or continue to conduct, the proposed or existing transportation services. The commission shall not issue or transfer a certificate unless the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The applicant is financially and organizationally capable of conducting an operation that complies with the rules and regulations of the Department of the California Highway Patrol governing highway safety.

(B) The applicant is committed to observing the hours of service regulations of state and federal law, where applicable, for all persons, whether employees or subcarriers, operating vehicles in transportation for
 compensation under the certificate.

(C) The applicant has a preventive maintenance program in effect for its vehicles used in transportation for compensation that conforms to regulations of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as described in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(D) The applicant participates in a program to regularly check the driving records of all persons, whether employees or subcarriers, operating vehicles used in transportation for compensation requiring a class B driver’s license under the certificate.

(E) The applicant has a safety education and training program in effect for all employees or subcarriers operating vehicles used in transportation for compensation.

(F) The applicant agrees to maintain its
 vehicles used in transportation for compensation in safe operating condition and in compliance with applicable laws and regulations relative to motor vehicle safety.

(G) The applicant has filed with the commission a certificate of workers’ compensation insurance coverage or statement required by Section 460.7.

(H) The applicant has provided the commission an address of an office or terminal where documents supporting the factual matters specified in the showings required by this subdivision may be inspected by the commission and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(2) With respect to subparagraphs (B) and (F) of paragraph (1), the commission may base its findings on a certification by the commission that an applicant has filed with it a sworn declaration of ability to comply and intent to comply.

(c) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (b), a passenger stage corporation shall meet all other state and federal regulations, where applicable, as prescribed.

(d) The commission may delegate to its executive director or his or her designee, the authority to issue or transfer certificates of public convenience and necessity and to make all necessary findings specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 694, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.1.

(a) The commission shall not issue or transfer a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to this article unless the applicant provides for a mandatory controlled substance and alcohol testing certification program as adopted by the commission.

(b) The commission, after considering any suggestions made by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall adopt a program that includes, but need not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) Drivers shall test negative for each of the controlled substances specified in Part 40 (commencing with Section 40.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, before employment. Drivers shall test negative for these controlled substances and for alcohol at such other times as the commission, after consulting the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall designate. As used in this section, a negative test for alcohol means an alcohol screening test showing a breath alcohol concentration of less than 0.02 percent.

(2) Procedures shall be substantially as in Part 40 (commencing with Section 40.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, except that the driver shall show a valid California driver’s license at the time and place of testing, and except as provided otherwise in this section. Requirements for rehabilitation and for return-to-duty and followup
 testing, and other requirements except as provided otherwise in this section, shall be substantially as in Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A test for one applicant shall be accepted as meeting the same requirement for any other applicant. Any negative test result shall be accepted for one year as meeting any requirement for periodic testing for that applicant or any other applicant, if the driver has not tested positive subsequent to a negative result. However, an earlier negative result shall not be accepted as meeting the pre-employment testing requirement for any subsequent employment, or any testing requirements under the program other than periodic testing.

(4) In the case of an applicant who is also a driver, test results shall be reported directly to the commission. In all other cases, results shall be reported
 directly to the applicant.

(5) All test results are confidential and shall not be released without the consent of the driver, except as authorized or required by law.

(6) Applicants shall be responsible for compliance with, and shall pay all costs of, this program with respect to their employees and potential employees, except that an applicant may require employees who test positive to pay the costs of rehabilitation and of return-to-duty and followup testing.

(7) The requirements of the program do not apply to any driver required to comply with the controlled substance and alcohol use and testing requirements of Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or Section 34520 of the Vehicle Code, or to any driver exempted from the provisions of that section.

(c) No evidence derived from a positive test result pursuant to the program shall be admissible in a criminal prosecution concerning unlawful possession, sale, or distribution of controlled substances.

(d) On the request of an applicant, the commission shall give the applicant a list of consortia certified pursuant to Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations that the commission knows offer tests in California.

(e) The commission shall conduct random and for-cause inspections of applicants’ documents supporting compliance with the program.

(f) For purposes of this section, “employment” includes self-employment as an independent driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 694, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.5.

The commission shall issue a certificate pursuant to this article to every passenger stage corporation which conducts intrastate passenger transportation service pursuant to federal operating authority, to the extent that regulation of these operations is not preempted by the federal Bus Regulatory Reform Act of 1982 (P.L. 97-261), as amended. The commission may attach any conditions or limitations to the issuance of the certificate which it may specify, consistent with federal law and regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 142, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.

The commission, in the exercise of the jurisdiction conferred upon it by the Constitution of this State and by this part, may grant certificates of public convenience and necessity, make decisions and orders, and prescribe rules affecting passenger stage corporations, notwithstanding the provisions of any ordinance or permit of any city, county, or city and county, and in case of conflict between any such order or rule and any such ordinance or permit, the certificate, decision, order, or rule of the commission shall prevail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.5.

(a) The commission may, at any time for good cause, suspend an operating right acquired by virtue of operations conducted on July 29, 1927, or a certificate of public convenience and necessity and, upon notice to the holder and opportunity to be heard, revoke, alter, or amend the operating right or certificate. 

(b) As an alternative to the suspension, revocation, alteration, or amendment of an operating right or certificate, the commission may impose upon the holder a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The commission may assess interest upon any fine
 imposed, the interest to commence upon the day the payment of the fine is delinquent. All fines and interest collected shall be deposited at least once each month in the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account in the General Fund. 

(c) For purposes of this section, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, either of the following: 

(1) A consistent failure of the holder of the operating right or certificate to maintain vehicles in a safe operating condition and in compliance with the Vehicle Code and with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor vehicle safety, as shown by the records of the commission, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or the passenger stage corporation. 

(2) The holder’s
 knowing and willful filing of a false report which understates revenues and fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 927, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.7.

(a) Upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that the certificate of a passenger stage corporation be suspended either (1) for failure to maintain any vehicle used in transportation for compensation in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor carrier safety, if that failure is either a consistent failure or presents an imminent danger to public safety, or (2) for failure to enroll all drivers in the pull notice system as required by
 Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code, the commission shall, pending a hearing in the matter pursuant to subdivision (d), suspend the corporation’s certificate. The department’s written recommendation shall specifically indicate compliance with subdivision (c). 

(b) A corporation whose certificate is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) may obtain a reinspection of its terminal and vehicles by the department, by submitting a written request for reinstatement to the commission and paying a reinstatement fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125). The commission shall deposit all reinstatement fees collected pursuant to this subdivision in the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account. The commission shall forward a request for reinspection to the department which shall perform a reinspection within a reasonable time. The commission shall reinstate a corporation’s certificate suspended under subdivision (a) promptly upon
 receipt of a written recommendation from the department that the corporation’s safety compliance has improved to the satisfaction of the department, unless the certificate is suspended for another reason or has been revoked. 

(c) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a) to the commission, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall notify the passenger stage corporation in writing of all of the following: 

(1) That the department has determined that the corporation’s safety record is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination. 

(2) That the determination may result in a suspension or revocation of the corporation’s certificate by the commission. 

(3) That the corporation may request a review of the determination by the department within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. If a review pursuant to this paragraph is requested by the corporation, the department shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting any notification to the commission pursuant to subdivision (a). 

(d) Whenever the commission suspends the certificate of any passenger stage corporation pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall furnish the corporation written notice of the suspension and shall hold a hearing within a reasonable time, not to exceed 21 days, after a written request therefor is filed with the commission, with a copy thereof furnished to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. At the hearing, the corporation shall show cause why the suspension should not be continued. At the conclusion of the hearing, the commission may, in
 addition to any other applicable penalty provided in this part, terminate the suspension, continue the suspension in effect, or revoke the certificate. The commission may revoke the certificate of any passenger stage corporation suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) at any time 90 days or more after its suspension if the commission has not received a written recommendation for reinstatement from the department and the corporation has not filed a written request for a hearing with the commission. 

(e) If the commission, after a hearing, finds that a passenger stage corporation has continued to operate as such after its certificate has been suspended pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do one of the following: 

(1) Revoke the certificate of the corporation. 

(2) Impose upon the holder of the certificate a
 civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day of unlawful operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 928, Sec. 4.5.   Effective October 14, 1991.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 41 of Ch. 928.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.8.

(a) Upon receipt of a stop order issued by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 3710.1 of the Labor Code, the commission shall investigate to determine whether the passenger stage corporation has filed a false statement relative to workers’ compensation insurance coverage, in violation of statute, or rules or orders of the commission. If, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the commission determines that there has been a violation of statute, or rules or orders of the commission, the commission shall impose appropriate penalties, which may include a fine and suspension of operating authority for a
 violation.

(b) Upon receipt of a complaint from the Director of Industrial Relations that a final judgment has been entered against any passenger stage corporation as a result of an award having been made to an employee pursuant to Section 3716.2 of the Labor Code, the commission shall, 30 days from the date notice to the corporation is mailed, revoke the corporation’s certificate of public convenience and necessity, unless the judgment has been satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States or the corporation requests a hearing pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) Within seven days of receipt of a complaint from the Director of Industrial Relations that a final judgment has been entered against any passenger stage corporation as a result of an award having been made to an employee pursuant to Section 3716.2 of the Labor Code, the
 commission shall furnish to the corporation named in the final judgment written notice of the right to a hearing regarding the complaint and the procedure to follow to request a hearing. The notice shall state that the commission is required to revoke the corporation’s certificate of public convenience and necessity to operate pursuant to subdivision (b) after 30 days from the date the notice is mailed unless the corporation provides proof that the judgment is satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States and the commission has been so notified seven days prior to the conclusion of the 30-day waiting period. The notice shall also inform the corporation of a right to a hearing and the procedures to follow to request a hearing. The corporation may request a hearing within 10 days from the date the notice is sent by the commission. The request for the hearing shall stay the revocation. The hearing shall be held within 30 days of the receipt of the request. If the
 commission finds that an unsatisfied judgment exists concerning a debt arising under Section 3717 of the Labor Code, the commission shall immediately revoke the corporation’s certificate of public convenience and necessity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1071, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.

When a complaint has been filed with the commission alleging that any passenger stage is being operated without a certificate of public convenience and necessity, contrary to or in violation of the provisions of this part, the commission may, with or without notice, make its order requiring the corporation or person operating or managing such passenger stage, to cease and desist from such operation, until the commission makes and files its decision on the complaint, or until further order of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.5.

Every corporation or person who knowingly and willfully issues, publishes, or affixes, or causes or permits the issuance, publishing, or affixing, of any oral or written advertisement, broadcast, or other holding out to the public, or any portion thereof, that the corporation or person is in operation as a passenger stage corporation without having a valid certificate or issued under this article is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable, if an individual, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both, or, if a corporation, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars
 ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 382, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.

Whether or not any stage, auto stage, or other motor vehicle is being, or is proposed to be operated as a passenger stage corporation “between fixed termini or over a regular route” within the meaning of this part is a question of fact, and the finding of the commission thereon is final and is not subject to review. Any act of transporting or attempting to transport any person or persons by stage, auto stage, or other motor vehicle upon a public highway of this State between two or more points not both within the limits of a single city or city and county, where the rate, charge, or fare for such transportation is computed, collected, or demanded on an individual fare basis,
 shall be presumed to be an act of operating as a passenger stage corporation within the meaning of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.

(a) Each application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity made under this article shall be accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars ($500), unless the applicant is already operating in the immediate vicinity under the jurisdiction of the commission.

(b) No certificate issued pursuant to, or rights to conduct any of the services authorized by, this article shall be sold, leased, or assigned, or otherwise transferred or encumbered, unless authorized by the commission. A filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300) shall accompany all applications for that
 authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 382, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.

Every passenger stage corporation which violates any provision of this article, or aids or abets, or without being present advises or encourages any person or corporation in such violation, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, if a person, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, or, if a corporation, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 348.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.

The interior of every passenger stage operated for hire in this State shall be maintained in a clean and sanitary condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.5.

A passenger stage corporation shall not operate any motor vehicle on a public highway unless there is displayed on the vehicle a distinctive identifying symbol in the form prescribed by the commission, showing the classification to which the vehicle belongs. The identifying symbol shall not be displayed until a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been issued under this chapter for the operation.

The identifying symbol displayed by a passenger stage corporation subject to the Interstate Commerce Commission shall serve in lieu of the display requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1369, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1039.

In every written or oral advertisement of the service it offers, every passenger stage corporation shall state the number of its certificate or identifying symbol, as specified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 382, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1040.

The commission shall, in issuing a certificate pursuant to this article, require the passenger stage corporation to procure, and to continue in effect during the life of the certificate, adequate protection against liability imposed by law upon the corporation for the payment of damages for personal bodily injuries, including death resulting therefrom, protection against a total liability of the corporation on account of bodily injuries to, or death of, more than one person as a result of any one accident, and protection against damage or destruction of property.

The minimum requirements
 for these assurances of protection against liability shall not be less than the requirements which are applicable to operations of carriers conducted pursuant to the federal Bus Regulatory Reform Act of 1982 (P.L. 97-261), as amended. However, for vehicles designed to carry not more than eight persons, including the driver, the commission shall not require protection against a total liability of the corporation on account of bodily injuries to, or death of, more than one person as a result of any one accident in an amount exceeding seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1056, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1041.

It is unlawful for the owner of a passenger stage employing or otherwise directing the driver of the passenger stage to permit the operation of the passenger stage upon any public highway for compensation without first having obtained from the commission a certificate pursuant to this chapter or without first having complied with the vehicle identification requirements of Section 1038.5 or the accident liability protection requirements of Section 1040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1093, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

(a) Every passenger stage corporation shall furnish the commission annually with a list, prepared under oath, of all vehicles used in transportation for compensation during the preceding year. This list shall include and identify each modified limousine and the terminal location of each modified limousine. The commission shall furnish a copy of this list identifying each modified limousine and its terminal location to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The commission shall also furnish a copy of this list to the corporation’s insurer, if the corporation’s accident liability protection is provided by a policy or policies of insurance.

(b) The commission shall not issue or continue in effect any permit, certificate, or authority of a passenger stage corporation that has not submitted fees required for inspection pursuant to Section 34500.4 of the Vehicle Code and any associated penalties, if applicable.

(c) If the passenger stage corporation’s insurer informs the commission that the corporation has failed to obtain insurance coverage for any vehicle reported on the list, the commission may, in addition to any other applicable penalty provided in this part, for a first occurrence, suspend the corporation’s certificate or impose a fine, or both, and for a second or subsequent occurrence may suspend or revoke the certificate or impose a fine, or both.

(d) As used in this section and Section 1042.1, “modified
 limousine” means any vehicle that has been modified, altered, or extended in a manner that increases the overall wheelbase of the vehicle, exceeding the original equipment manufacturer’s published wheelbase dimension for the base model and year of the vehicle, in any amount sufficient to accommodate additional passengers with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the driver, and is used in the transportation of passengers for hire. For purposes of this subdivision, “wheelbase” means the longitudinal distance between the vertical centerlines of the front and rear wheels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 1.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.1.

Not later than January 1, 2015, the commission shall provide the Department of the California Highway Patrol with a list of each passenger stage corporation’s modified limousines and their terminal locations in order for the department to promulgate regulations pursuant to Section 34500.4 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

Every passenger stage corporation earning over three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in annual gross operating revenue shall, under oath, file annually a report indicating the number, classification, and compensation of all employees and owner-operator drivers hired or engaged during the reporting period. The commission shall submit a copy of the report to the administrator of the corporation’s workers’ compensation self-insurance plan if the corporation is self-insured, or to the corporation’s workers’ compensation insurer if the corporation’s workers’ compensation protection is provided by a policy or policies of insurance. The commission shall
 not be obligated to undertake an independent investigation of the adequacy of workers’ compensation insurance coverage based on the information contained in the report if the carrier has complied with Section 460.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1240, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

When the executive director of the commission determines that any passenger stage corporation, or any officer, director, or agent of any passenger stage corporation, has engaged in, is engaged in, or is about to engage in, any acts or practices in violation of this chapter, or any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement issued under this chapter, the executive director may make application to the superior court for an order enjoining those acts or practices or for an order directing compliance. The court may grant a permanent or temporary injunction,
 restraining order, or other order, including, but not limited to, an order allowing vehicles used for subsequent operations subject to the order to be impounded at the carrier’s expense and subject to release only by subsequent court order following a petition to the court by the defendant or owner of the vehicle, upon a showing by the executive director that a person or corporation has engaged in or is about to engage in these acts or practices. The commission may contract with the Department of the California Highway Patrol or a sheriff to assist in enforcement of an order for vehicle impound. Any costs incurred by the commission for that assistance are not assignable to the carrier as an expense of impound.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

After the cancellation or revocation of a certificate, or during the period of its suspension, it is unlawful for a passenger stage corporation to conduct any operations as a carrier. The commission may either grant or deny an application for a new certificate whenever it appears that a prior certificate of the applicant has been canceled or revoked pursuant to Section 1033.5 or whenever it appears, after hearing, that as a prior certificate holder, the applicant engaged in any of the unlawful activities set forth in Section 1033.5 for which his or her certificate
 might have been canceled or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Bus” means a vehicle designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 10 persons, including the driver, which is used to transport persons for compensation or profit.

(2) “Limousine” means any sedan or sport utility vehicle, of either standard or extended length, with a seating capacity of not more than 10 passengers including the driver, used in the transportation of passengers for hire on a prearranged basis within this state, and includes a modified limousine as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1042.

(3) “Peace officer” means a person who is designated as a peace officer pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(b) A peace officer may, with respect to a passenger stage corporation, enforce and assist in the enforcement of Sections 2110 and 2112, resulting from a violation of Section 1031, 1041, or 1045, or more than one of those sections. A peace officer may additionally enforce and assist in the enforcement of Sections 1034.5 and 2119. In any case in which an arrest authorized by this subdivision is made for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor, and the person arrested does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, the arresting peace officer may, instead of taking such person before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The provisions of that chapter shall thereafter apply
 with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(c) A peace officer may impound a bus or limousine operated by a passenger stage corporation pursuant to Section 14602.9 of the Vehicle Code if the peace officer determines that any of the following violations occurred while the driver was operating the vehicle:

(1) The driver was operating the bus or limousine when the passenger stage corporation did not have a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission as required pursuant to this article.

(2) The driver was operating the bus or limousine when the operating rights or certificate of public convenience and necessity of a passenger stage corporation was suspended, canceled, or revoked pursuant to Section 1033.5, 1033.7, or 1045.

(3) The driver was operating the bus or limousine without having a current and valid driver’s license of the proper class.

(d) The commission shall coordinate enforcement of this section with those peace officers likely to be involved in enforcing this section, including undertaking both of the following:

(1) Educational outreach to promote awareness among those peace officers about the requirements of Sections 1031, 1034.5, 1041, 1045, 2110, 2112, and 2119.

(2) Establishing lines of communication so that the commission is notified if an action is commenced to enforce the requirements of those sections specified in subdivision (b), so that the commission may take appropriate action to enforce the fine and penalty provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with
 Section 2100).

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is intended to facilitate and enhance the commission’s performance of its functions pursuant to Section 2101 and not diminish the commission’s authority or responsibility pursuant to that section.

(f) This section does not authorize the impoundment of privately owned personal vehicles that are not common carriers nor the impoundment of vehicles used in transportation for compensation by charter-party carriers of passengers that are not required to carry individual permits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 41.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Electrical and Gas Corporations [1091. - 1103.]

1091.

In addition to the requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1001) and any other provision of law, every electrical and every gas corporation proposing to construct or modify any electric or gas plant within the state, or line, or extension, which will in the case of an electrical plant, line, or extension add generating capacity in excess of 50 megawatts, or in the case of a gas plant, line, or extension cost in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), or proposing to construct any electric or gas plant out-of-state of which at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the costs will be borne by the corporation, shall comply with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

Whenever application is made to the commission for certification of an electric or gas plant, line, or extension subject to this article, the commission shall appoint a construction project board of consultants to evaluate the design, construction, project management, and economic soundness of the proposed plant, line, or extension, if the commission determines that a significant potential exists for the occurrence of problems in any of the areas for which an electrical or gas corporation is required to submit information pursuant to Section 1003 or 1003.5. The extent of the board’s evaluation shall be determined by the commission. The board may, upon approval of the commission, employ staff independent of the commission staff to carry out its functions under this article. The board may, upon approval of the commission, undertake special studies addressing potential problem areas identified by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

(a) The construction project board of consultants shall consist of eminently qualified and highly experienced design, construction, and project management economic specialists who can, as a group or as individuals, independently and objectively address the full scope of design, construction, and project management and economic evaluations requested by the commission.

(b) No member of the construction project board of consultants shall have a current financial interest in, or receive any significant amount of his or her annual compensation for consulting services in his or her area of special expertise from, any corporation or person which has a financial interest in the project. The commission shall define financial interest and significant amount of annual compensation for purposes of this subdivision. Any person considered for appointment to the board shall disclose to the commission any interests in the project or in any corporation or person with a financial interest in the project and any compensation received for consulting services which may constitute a prohibited financial interest.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person appointed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission as a member of a board of consultants for the construction of a hydroelectric generation facility or related transmission line who receives compensation from an electrical corporation constructing that facility or line as a member of that board of consultants is not disqualified from an appointment to a construction project board of consultants pursuant to Section 1092.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

The members of the construction project board of consultants shall receive fees and expenses from the commission. The corporation whose project the construction project board of consultants is evaluating shall, upon demand of the commission, reimburse the commission for the amount expended by the commission for the fees and other expenses of the board, including, but not limited to, special studies, staff, or commission staff costs directly attributable to activities of the construction project board of consultants.

The commission shall deposit all money received pursuant to this section at least once each month in the Certification Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The money in the Certification Fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the commission in augmentation of any other appropriation for the support of the board.

The commission may allow the inclusion of any amounts received from an electrical or gas corporation pursuant to this section as an authorized expense for purposes of establishing rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

The corporation shall provide the construction project board of consultants with all information the board determines necessary for its evaluation of the project. The corporation shall provide information regarding problems and uncertainties which have been encountered during the planning, design, and development of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

The construction project board of consultants shall evaluate the design, construction, project management, and economic soundness of the project as directed by the commission, and submit an appropriate written report of its findings and recommendations to the commission and the corporation prior to the commission’s issuance of a certificate. The members of the board may provide testimony before the commission in formal or informal hearings on the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1097.
